Tennessee, session 114, SB1165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Each county election commission shall include on the November 2026
election ballot the following question:
Should the State of Tennessee legalize the sale, possession, and use of medical
marijuana? YES or NO
SECTION 2. The secretary of state shall compile the results of the public policy opinion
poll in Section 1 and forward the results to each member of the general assembly.
SECTION 3. The outcome of the public policy opinion poll is not binding on the general
assembly.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1165
002645
- 1 -